Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.8351

Exceptional faculty awards—"Foundation" defined.

For purposes of RCW 28B.50.835 through 28B.50.843 "foundation" means a private nonprofit corporation that: (1) Is registered under Title 24 RCW and qualified as a tax-exempt entity under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code; (2) exists solely for the benefit of one or more community or technical colleges in this state; and (3) is registered with the attorney general's office under the charitable trust act, chapter 11.110 RCW.

[ 1993 c 87 s 3.]